District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1803.01

Additional revenues.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 604a
as added Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 3022(b), 54 DCR 7052
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 3011(b), 57 DCR 181
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9052(a)(2), 58 DCR 6226

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3022(b) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3011(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3011(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).